Maryland, session 2025, HB1473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–3301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Office” means the Governor’s Office of Immigrant Affairs.
9–3303.1.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE OFFICE SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A STRATEGY TO ENFORCE THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
§ 10–1103 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR EACH IDENTIFIED STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY,
OR PROGRAM;
(2) OVERSEE, MONITOR, INVESTIGATE, AND ENFORCE COMPLIANCE
WITH § 10–1103 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR EACH IDENTIFIED STATE DEPARTMENT,
AGENCY, OR PROGRAM;
(3) DESIGNATE A LANGUAGE ACCESS COMPLIANCE PROGRAM
DIRECTOR;
(4) PROVIDE GUIDANCE AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES AND THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING, ON THE
DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF LANGUAGE ACCESS PLANS AND POLICIES
TO STATE DEPARTMENTS, AGENCIES, AND PROGRAMS IDENTIFIED UNDER §
10–1103 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(5) IN PERFORMING THE DUTIES REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, SOLICIT FEEDBACK FROM STAKEHOLDERS THROUGH PUBLIC
COMMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1473
(B) THE OFFICE MAY DEVELOP AND UPDATE LANGUAGE ACCESS POLICY
AND LANGUAGE ACCESS STANDARD OPERATING PROCEDURE TEMPLATES FOR A
STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM IDENTIFIED UNDER § 10–1103 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(C) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN
THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $400,000 FOR THE OFFICE TO
IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
10–1102.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Equal access” means to be informed of, participate in, and benefit from
public services offered by a State department, agency, or program, at a level equal to
English proficient individuals.
(2) “EQUAL ACCESS” INCLUDES THE ABILITY TO RECEIVE LANGUAGE
ASSISTANCE THAT:
(I) ENSURES ACCURATE, TIMELY, AND EFFECTIVE
COMMUNICATION AT NO COST TO THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) IS NOT SIGNIFICANTLY RESTRICTED, DELAYED, OR OF
LOWER QUALITY COMPARED TO PROGRAMS OR ACTIVITIES AVAILABLE TO
ENGLISH–PROFICIENT INDIVIDUALS.
[(c) “Limited English proficiency” means the inability to adequately understand
or express oneself in the spoken or written English language.]
(C) “LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN” MEANS A WRITTEN DOCUMENT THAT
STANDARDIZES THE LANGUAGE ACCESS COMPLIANCE POLICY, STANDARD
OPERATING PROCEDURE, REPORTING, AND COMPLAINT PROCESS FOR EACH STATE
DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM.
(d) [“Oral language] “LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE services” includes various
methods to provide verbal information and interpretation such as:
(1) staff interpreters, bilingual staff, telephone interpreter programs, and
private interpreter programs; AND
(2) SIGN LANGUAGES, BRAILLE, TDD/TT/TTY, LARGE PRINT, PLAIN
LANGUAGE, AND OTHER COMMUNICATION ACCOMMODATIONS USED BY
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.

HOUSE BILL 1473 5
(E) “LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY” MEANS A LIMITED ABILITY TO READ,
WRITE, SPEAK, OR UNDERSTAND ENGLISH IN A MANNER THAT ALLOWS EFFECTIVE
COMMUNICATION WITH A STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM TO HAVE
ACCESS TO AND PARTICIPATE IN SERVICES, ACTIVITIES, PROGRAMS, OR OTHER
BENEFITS ADMINISTERED BY THE STATE.
[(e)] (F) “Program” means all of the operations of a State department, State
agency, or any other instrumentality of the State.
(G) “PUBLIC CONTACT POSITIONS” ARE POSITIONS IN A STATE
DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM FOR WHICH THE PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
INCLUDE GREETING, MEETING, OR PROVIDING INFORMATION OR SERVICES TO THE
PUBLIC.
[(f)] (H) (1) “Vital documents” means all applications or informational
materials, notices, and complaint forms offered by State departments, agencies, and
programs THAT ARE CRITICAL FOR ACCESSING A STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR
PROGRAM.
(2) “VITAL DOCUMENTS” INCLUDE:
(I) EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS AND RISK COMMUNICATIONS;
(II) ONLINE AND PAPER APPLICATIONS;
(III) CONSENT FORMS;
(IV) COMPLAINT FORMS;
(V) ALL CATEGORIES OF LETTERS OR NOTICES PERTAINING TO
THE ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE BENEFITS;
(VI) WRITTEN TESTS EVALUATING COMPETENCY FOR A LICENSE,
JOB, OR SKILL FOR WHICH ENGLISH PROFICIENCY IS NOT REQUIRED;
(VII) DOCUMENTS THAT ARE REQUIRED BY LAW; AND
(VIII) NOTICES AT NO COST REGARDING THE AVAILABILITY OF
LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH
PROFICIENCY.
[(2)] (3) “Vital documents” does not include applications and
examinations related to the licensure, certification, or registration under the Health

HOUSE BILL 1473
Occupations Article, Financial Institutions Article, Business Occupations and Professions
Article, and Business Regulation Article within the jurisdiction of the Maryland
Department of Health or the Maryland Department of Labor.
10–1103.
(a) Each State department, agency, or program listed or identified under
subsection (c) of this section shall:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP A
LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN;
(2) take reasonable steps to provide equal access to public services for
individuals with limited English proficiency[.] WHO NEED LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE,
INCLUDING ANY ORAL, WRITTEN, AND SIGN LANGUAGE SERVICES NEEDED TO ASSIST
INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY AND INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES TO:
(I) COMMUNICATE EFFECTIVELY WITH STATE PERSONNEL AND
CONTRACTORS;
(II) GAIN EQUAL ACCESS TO PUBLIC SERVICES; AND
(III) PROVIDE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
SERVICES, ACTIVITIES, PROGRAMS, OR OTHER BENEFITS PROVIDED BY A STATE
DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM;
(3) PROVIDE ORAL LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING
INTERPRETATION IN NON–ENGLISH LANGUAGES PROVIDED IN PERSON OR
REMOTELY BY A QUALIFIED INTERPRETER FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WITH LIMITED
ENGLISH PROFICIENCY;
(4) ARRANGE FOR QUALIFIED BILINGUAL OR MULTILINGUAL STAFF
TO COMMUNICATE DIRECTLY WITH INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH
PROFICIENCY;
(5) PROVIDE NOTICES OF THE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES
THAT ARE AVAILABLE; AND
[(b) Reasonable steps to provide equal access to public services include:
(1) the provision of oral language services for individuals with limited
English proficiency, which must be through face–to–face, in–house oral language services
if contact between the agency and individuals with limited English proficiency is on a
weekly or more frequent basis;]

HOUSE BILL 1473 7
[(2) (i)] (6) (3) ARRANGE FOR the translation of vital documents
ordinarily provided to the public into any language spoken by any limited English proficient
population that constitutes [3%] 0.5% of the [overall] population [within the geographic
area served by a local office of a] OF THE State [program] as measured by the United States
Census[; and
(ii) the provision of vital documents translated under item (i) of this
item on a statewide basis to any local office as necessary; and
(3) any additional methods or means necessary to achieve equal access to
public services].
(B) (1) IN DEVELOPING THE LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, EACH STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR
PROGRAM SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE THE NUMBER OR PERCENTAGE OF
INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY WHO ARE ELIGIBLE TO BE
SERVED BY, OR LIKELY TO HAVE AN ENCOUNTER WITH, THE STATE DEPARTMENT,
AGENCY, OR PROGRAM;
(II) ESTIMATE THE FREQUENCY WITH WHICH INDIVIDUALS
WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY WILL COME INTO CONTACT WITH THE STATE
DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM; AND
(III) DETERMINE THE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE RESOURCES
AVAILABLE TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM.
(2) EACH STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM SHALL
UPDATE THE LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN EVERY 2 YEARS AND INCLUDE:
(I) THE TYPES AND DESCRIPTIONS OF LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE
SERVICES THAT THE STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM WILL PROVIDE;
(II) A LIST OF THE LANGUAGES, INCLUDING DIALECTS, OR
FORMS OF COMMUNICATION FOR WHICH A STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR
PROGRAM WILL PROVIDE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES AND THE RATIONALE
FOR SELECTING THE LANGUAGES, DIALECTS, OR FORMS OF COMMUNICATION;
(III) AN EVALUATION AND ASSESSMENT OF THE ADEQUACY OF
THE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES TO BE PROVIDED;

HOUSE BILL 1473
(IV) A DESCRIPTION AND FREQUENCY OF TRAINING FOR PUBLIC
CONTACT STAFF ON THE LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN;
(V) THE PROCESS FOR FILING A COMPLAINT RELATED TO A
LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICE; AND
(VI) A DESCRIPTION OF THE FUNDING AND BUDGETARY
SOURCES TO IMPLEMENT THE LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN.
(c) (1) The provisions of this section shall be fully implemented according to
the following schedule:
[(1)] (I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, FULL IMPLEMENTATION BY
THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF IMMIGRANT AFFAIRS; AND
(II) on ON or before July 1, [2003] 2028, full implementation THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE FULLY IMPLEMENTED by:
[(i) the Department of Human Services;
(ii) the Maryland Department of Labor;
(iii) the Maryland Department of Health;
(iv) the Department of Juvenile Services; and
(v) the Workers’ Compensation Commission;
(2) on or before July 1, 2004, full implementation by:
(i) the Department of Aging;
(ii) the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services;
(iii) the Department of Transportation, not including the Maryland
Transit Administration;
(iv) the Commission on Civil Rights;
(v) the Department of State Police; and
(vi) five independent agencies, boards, or commissions, to be
determined by the Secretary of Human Services, in consultation with the Office of the
Attorney General;
(3) on or before July 1, 2005, full implementation by:

HOUSE BILL 1473 9
(i) the Comptroller of Maryland;
(ii) the Department of Housing and Community Development;
(iii) the Maryland Transit Administration;
(iv) the Department of Natural Resources;
(v) the Maryland State Department of Education;
(vi) the Office of the Attorney General; and
(vii) five independent agencies, boards, or commissions to be
determined by the Secretary of Human Services, in consultation with the Office of the
Attorney General;
(4) on or before July 1, 2006, full implementation by:
(i) the Department of Agriculture;
(ii) the Department of Commerce;
(iii) the Department of Veterans and Military Families;
(iv) the Department of the Environment; and
(v) five independent agencies, boards, or commissions to be
determined by the Secretary of Human Services, in consultation with the Office of the
Attorney General;]
1. (I) THE WORKERS’ COMPENSATION COMMISSION;
2. (II) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS;
3. (III) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE;
4. (IV) THE COMPTROLLER OF MARYLAND;
5. (V) THE MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION;
6. (VI) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
7. (VII) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;

HOUSE BILL 1473
8. (VIII) FIVE INDEPENDENT AGENCIES, BOARDS, OR
COMMISSIONS, TO BE DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
[(5)] 9. (IX) [on or before July 1, 2025, full implementation by]
each principal department listed under § 8–201 of this article[; and].
[(6)] (2) [if] IF a principal department is created on or after October 1,
[2024] 2028, the principal department shall comply with the requirements of this section
beginning 1 year after the date on which the principal department is created.
(D) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, EACH STATE DEPARTMENT,
AGENCY, OR PROGRAM IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF IMMIGRANT AFFAIRS
MARYLAND LANGUAGE ADVISORY GROUP THAT CONTAINS THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION FOR THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR:
(1) A SUMMARY OF ALL ACTIVITIES PERFORMED, INCLUDING A
SELF–ASSESSMENT AND EXPLANATION OF ANY UNMET OBJECTIVES; AND
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS SERVED FROM THE TOTAL
POPULATION SERVED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM,
DISAGGREGATED BY LANGUAGE;
(3) THE NUMBER AND TYPES OF LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES
PROVIDED, DISAGGREGATED BY LANGUAGE;
(4) THE NAMES OF ALL ORGANIZATIONS RECEIVING GRANTS OR
CONTRACTS TO PROVIDE LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES FROM THE STATE
DEPARTMENT, AGENCY, OR PROGRAM;
(5) AN ITEMIZED BUDGET FOR LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES
EXPENDITURES;
(6) A LIST OF QUALIFIED BILINGUAL OR MULTILINGUAL PERSONNEL
EMPLOYED IN PUBLIC CONTACT POSITIONS BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY,
OR PROGRAM; AND
(7) THE NUMBER OF LANGUAGE ACCESS COMPLAINTS RECEIVED, THE
CURRENT STATUS OF THE COMPLAINTS, AND THE STEPS TAKEN TO RESOLVE THE
COMPLAINTS ANY OTHER PERFORMANCE MEASURES REQUIRED BY THE MARYLAND
LANGUAGE ADVISORY GROUP.
10–1103.1.

HOUSE BILL 1473 11
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVISORY GROUP” MEANS THE MARYLAND
LANGUAGE ADVISORY GROUP.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT
OF DISABILITIES SHALL CONVENE THE MARYLAND LANGUAGE ADVISORY GROUP TO
MAKE FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS ON OVERSIGHT, MONITORING,
INVESTIGATION, AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE ADVISORY GROUP SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE DIRECTOR, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF THE DEAF AND HARD OF
HEARING, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF LABOR, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE SECRETARY OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(8) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE.
(D) THE DIRECTOR OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE AND THE SECRETARY OF
DISABILITIES OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE ARE THE CO–CHAIRS OF THE
ADVISORY GROUP.
(E) THE STAFFING RESPONSIBILITIES SHALL BE SHARED BY THE OFFICE
AND THE DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES.
(F) THE ADVISORY GROUP SHALL MEET AT LEAST TWICE EACH YEAR.
(G) (1) THE ADVISORY GROUP MAY ESTABLISH WORKGROUPS AS
NECESSARY TO COMPLETE THE DUTIES OF THE ADVISORY GROUP.

HOUSE BILL 1473
(2) A WORKGROUP ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE MEMBERS THAT ARE NOT LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION.
(H) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, THE ADVISORY GROUP SHALL:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE APPROPRIATE STATE AND LOCAL
AGENCIES AND COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS:
(I) REVIEW ANY LANGUAGE ACCESS PLANS, AS DEFINED IN §
10–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE, DEVELOPED BY STATE DEPARTMENTS, AGENCIES, AND
PROGRAMS TO DEVELOP A TEMPLATE LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN;
(II) REVIEW LAWS AND BEST PRACTICES OF LOCAL
JURISDICTIONS AND OTHER STATES RELATING TO LANGUAGE ACCESS;
(III) DEVELOP A TEMPLATE LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN, AS
DEFINED IN § 10–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE, FOR STATE DEPARTMENTS, AGENCIES, OR
PROGRAMS;
(IV) DEVELOP A TEMPLATE LANGUAGE ACCESS POLICY AND
TEMPLATE LANGUAGE ACCESS STANDARD OPERATING PROCEDURE FOR STATE
DEPARTMENTS, AGENCIES, OR PROGRAMS;
(V) RECOMMEND AT LEAST ONE STATE DEPARTMENT, AGENCY,
OR PROGRAM TO PERFORM OVERSIGHT, MONITORING, INVESTIGATION, AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(VI) ESTABLISH A FRAMEWORK TO ASSESS IF STATE
DEPARTMENTS, AGENCIES, AND PROGRAMS ARE IN COMPLIANCE WITH § 10–1103 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(VII) SOLICIT INPUT FROM THE STAKEHOLDERS IDENTIFIED
UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(2) SOLICIT INPUT FROM:
(I) LEGAL AND SOCIAL SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS THAT
PROVIDE SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY, AS
DEFINED IN § 10–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) LEGAL AND SOCIAL SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS THAT
PROVIDE SERVICES TO INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;

HOUSE BILL 1473 13
(III) DISABILITY RIGHTS ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS;
(IV) IMMIGRANTS’ RIGHTS ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS;
(V) INDIVIDUALS WITH LIVED EXPERIENCE WITH LIMITED
ENGLISH PROFICIENCY, AS DEFINED IN § 10–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE, SIGN
LANGUAGE, VISUAL DISABILITIES, OR OTHER COMMUNICATION DISABILITIES; AND
(VI) OTHER RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS.
(I) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 EACH YEAR, THE ADVISORY GROUP SHALL
SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE WORK OF THE ADVISORY GROUP;
AND
(II) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ADVISORY GROUP.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.